Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6328.01
Reciprocity.

Any individual or firm who or which has been issued a license, a certificate, or accreditation for training in another state which (1) has a licensure, certification, or accreditation program approved by the federal Environmental Protection Agency, (2) has licensure, accreditation, certification, education, and experience requirements substantially equal to or greater than those adopted by this state, and (3) grants equal licensure, certification, and accreditation privileges to individuals and firms licensed or accredited and residing in this state may be issued an equivalent license or accreditation in Nebraska upon terms and conditions determined by the department. The terms and conditions may reduce the time period the license is valid and the fee requirements.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 53;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 146;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1280.